Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-231
Executive director; powers and duties.

The members of the authority shall appoint an executive director who shall be an employee but not a member of the authority and who shall serve at the pleasure of the members and receive compensation fixed by the members. The executive director shall serve as the ex officio secretary of the authority, shall administer, manage, and direct the affairs and activities of the authority in accordance with the policies and under the control and direction of the members, and shall approve all accounts for salaries, allowable expenses of the authority or of any employee or consultant thereof, and expenses incidental to the operation of the authority. The executive director may, to the extent he or she deems it advisable, establish such divisions within the authority as necessary to carry out the public purposes of the authority. He or she shall perform such other duties as may be directed by the members in carrying out the purposes of the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 31;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 33.